Washington statutes.
RCW 10.97.045

Disposition data to initiating agency and state patrol.

Whenever a court or other criminal justice agency reaches a disposition of a criminal proceeding, the court or other criminal justice agency shall furnish the disposition data to the agency initiating the criminal history record for that charge and to the identification section of the Washington state patrol as required under RCW 43.43.745.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 36 s 6.]